Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB700.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 507.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of vehicular homicide when:
(a) He or she causes the death of another; and
(b) The death results from the person's operation of a motor vehicle, including but
not limited to boats and airplanes:[,]
1. In excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour above the speed limit;
2. In violation of KRS 189.580(1)(a); or
3. While under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, or other
substance which impairs driving ability as described in KRS 189A.010.
(2) Vehicular homicide is a Class B felony.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as Daniel's Law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:38 PM Jacketed